da/braille/future/da-dk-g16.utb
# Danish Grade 1 Braille table
# By Bue Vester-Andersen (bue@vester-andersen.dk)

# Display upcodes
# The ANSI version should probably be used in most cases.
# Uncomment the one you want.

#include da-ansi6.dis
#include da-unicode6.dis

#Character definitions
include da-chardefs6.cti

# Rules for grade 1 and grade 2

always \s 	0	#Blank represented by a blank braille cell
always \t	0	#Ensures tab is a blank cell

# Hyphen
hyphen - 36

letsign 6
noletsign Ii

#no capsign defined.
# Caps are normally only marked in special cases in forwad translation, i.e. single letters, abreviations etc.
#nofor capsign 46 (does not work with current version) of LibLouis
begcaps 456
endcaps 6

#Capsign also implies letsign. So, nocontractions
capsnocont

# Single caps for forward trans.
word A 46-1
word B 46-12
word C 46-14
word D 46-145
word E 46-15
word F 46-124
word G 46-1245
word H 46-125
#No i since i is a word in itself.
word J 46-245
word K 46-13
word L 46-123
word M 46-134
word N 46-1345
word O 46-135
word P 46-1234
word Q 46-12345
word R 46-1235
word S 46-234
word T 46-2345
word U 46-136
word V 46-1236
word W 46-2456
word X 46-1346
word Y 46-13456
word Z 46-1356
word \x00c6 46-345
word \x00d8 46-246
word \x00c5 46-16

#always support capsign when back-translating
nofor always A 46-1
nofor always B 46-12
nofor always C 46-14
nofor always D 46-145
nofor always E 46-15
nofor always F 46-124
nofor always G 46-1245
nofor always H 46-125
nofor always I 46-24
nofor always J 46-245
nofor always K 46-13
nofor always L 46-123
nofor always M 46-134
nofor always N 46-1345
nofor always O 46-135
nofor always P 46-1234
nofor always Q 46-12345
nofor always R 46-1235
nofor always S 46-234
nofor always T 46-2345
nofor always U 46-136
nofor always V 46-1236
nofor always W 46-2456
nofor always X 46-1346
nofor always Y 46-13456
nofor always Z 46-1356
nofor always \x00c6 46-345
nofor always \x00d8 46-246
nofor always \x00c5 46-16

numsign 3456
multind 6-3456 letsign numsign
litdigit 1 1
litdigit 2 12
litdigit 3 14
litdigit 4 145
litdigit 5 15
litdigit 6 124
litdigit 7 1245
litdigit 8 125
litdigit 9 24
litdigit 0 245

# Punctuations and numbers
decpoint , 2
midnum , 2
midnum . 3
midnum - 36
midnum / 34
midnum : 25

# various rules for math signs etc.
joinnum = 2356
joinnum + 235
joinnum - 36
joinnum \x00d7 3 #multiplication sign
joinnum \x00f7 256 # Division sign
endnum % 0-245-356
endnum \x2030 0-245-356-356
